Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 4. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES AND UNEMPLOYMENT

SUBTITLE B. TEXAS WORKFORCE COMMISSION; WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT; EMPLOYMENT SERVICES

CHAPTER 310. CHILD-CARE RESOURCE AND REFERRAL NETWORK

Sec. 310.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Member" means a member of the child-care resource and referral network that provides child-care resource and referral services in this state.

(2) "Network" means the child-care resource and referral network administered by a nonprofit public or private organization that contracts with the commission to provide child-care resource and referral services in this state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1445, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 310.002. CHILD-CARE RESOURCE AND REFERRAL NETWORK. (a) The commission, through funds allocated to the commission as the agency designated to administer the grant under the Child Care and Development Block Grant Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Section 9858 et seq.), as amended, and specifically appropriated to the commission for that purpose, shall:

(1) contract with a child-care resource and referral network to provide child-care resource and referral services in this state; and

(2) require the network to be administered in compliance with the requirements of the block grant program.

(b) The commission shall use a system of competitive procurement to award a contract to a child-care resource and referral network that has proven experience in providing child-care resource and referral services.

(c) To the extent funds from the block grant program are available for that purpose, the commission shall award the contract under this section in a manner that will allow for the provision of child-care resource and referral services throughout this state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1445, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 310.003. STATEWIDE CHILD-CARE NEEDS ASSESSMENT. (a) The network shall conduct a needs assessment to determine the supply of and demand for child-care services in this state and to identify discrepancies between that supply and demand.

(b) Based on the needs assessment, the network shall make recommendations to the commission regarding collaborative solutions to address the identified child-care supply and demand discrepancies. The recommended solutions must involve collaboration between:

(1) local workforce development boards;

(2) community-based social services agencies;

(3) employers;

(4) child-care providers; and

(5) parents who are consumers of child-care services.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1445, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 310.004. RESOURCE SERVICES. The network, through its members, shall provide and continually update resource information regarding:

(1) child-care and early childhood education services in this state; and

(2) assistance in becoming a child-care provider, including information about:

(A) the general requirements for applying for and maintaining a license, listing, or registration under Chapter 42, Human Resources Code; and

(B) the availability of financial resources and educational, technical, and other training opportunities, including management skills training and continuing education programs for operators and employees of child-care facilities, regardless of whether the network or another person provides those opportunities.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1445, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 310.005. REFERRAL SERVICES. (a) The network, through its members, shall provide referral services to:

(1) a person who is seeking child-care and early childhood education services; and

(2) an employer seeking child-care assistance for the employer or an employee through:

(A) a consultation regarding the availability of child-care and early childhood education services; or

(B) specialized services for the employer or its employees.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(b) In addition to providing referrals to child-care and early childhood education services, the network, through its members, shall provide:

(1) referrals to available support services, including:

(A) parenting education classes; and

(B) services for parents or children offered by health and human services agencies, as defined by Section 531.001, Government Code, or otherwise available in the community; and

(2) information for consumers of child-care and early childhood education services, including:

(A) information regarding early childhood development;

(B) criteria for identifying quality child-care and early childhood education services that support the healthy development of children; and

(C) other information that will assist consumers in making informed and effective choices regarding child-care and early childhood education services.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(b) In addition to providing referrals to child-care and early childhood education services, the network, through its members, shall provide:

(1) referrals to available support services, including:

(A) parenting education classes; and

(B) services for parents or children offered by health and human services agencies, as defined by Section 521.0001, Government Code, or otherwise available in the community; and

(2) information for consumers of child-care and early childhood education services, including:

(A) information regarding early childhood development;

(B) criteria for identifying quality child-care and early childhood education services that support the healthy development of children; and

(C) other information that will assist consumers in making informed and effective choices regarding child-care and early childhood education services.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1445, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.141, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 310.006. ADVERTISEMENT OF SERVICES. (a) The network, through its members, shall inform parents, child-care consumers, child-care providers, and employers located in the member's service area of:

(1) the resource and referral services available from the network; and

(2) the methods by which a person may contact the member to access resource and referral services.

(b) A member may provide the information under Subsection (a) through the media and alternative means, including:

(1) state and local community, job, and health fairs;

(2) public service announcements and advertisements;

(3) career development centers;

(4) offices of health and human services agencies;

(5) Texas workforce centers that comprise the Texas Workforce Network; and

(6) direct contacts with employers and child-care providers.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1445, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 310.007. COLLECTION OF CHILD-CARE DATA. (a) The network, through its members, shall:

(1) collect and continuously update statewide data regarding the supply of and demand for child-care and early childhood education services in this state;

(2) report the data to the commission each calendar quarter; and

(3) make the information available statewide.

(b) The data required by this section must include a comprehensive compilation of all available child-care and early childhood education services in this state and information concerning unmet needs of consumers with respect to those services.

(c) The commission and the Department of Protective and Regulatory Services shall provide assistance to the network and members of the network in collecting, aggregating, and updating the data required by this section.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1445, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 310.008. RULES. The commission may adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1445, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.